src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON VerbPrefixes
Adv+: T10 ;
       T9 ;
      
LEXICON T10 
:shé   	T9 ;
:łeghá  T9 ;
:da	   	T9 ;
:dzí   	T9 ;
:xa	   	T9 ;
:ná	   	T9 ;
:ní     T9 ; ! flag for ní...gha

LEXICON T9
 T8 ;
Distr+:dá T8 ;

LEXICON T8
 T7 ;
Iter+:na T7 ;

LEXICON T7 
 T6 ;
NI+:la T6 ;
NI+:dhá T6 ;
NI+:ts’ah T6 ;
NI+:tł’uł T6 ;

LEXICON T6
 T5 ;
1SgO+:se T5 ;
2SgO+:ne T5 ;
3SgO+:be T5 ;
3SgO+: T5 ;
4SgO+:ye T5 ;
1DuO+:nuhe T5 ;
2DuO+:nuhe T5 ;
1PlO+:nuhe T5 ;
2PlO+:nuhe T5 ;
Unsp+:ɂe T5 ;
Refl+:ɂede	 T5 ;
Recipr+:ɂełe T5 ;
Ar+:ho		 T5 ;

LEXICON T5 
UnspS+:ts’e T4 ;
Du3+:he T4 ;
Ar+:ho T4 ;
 T4 ;

LEXICON T4
T3 ;
Gen1+:de T3 ;
Gen2+:ne T3 ;
Gen3+:ho T3 ;
Incept+:te T3 ;
Incept+:he T3 ;
Ser+:i	 T3 ;
Ser+:u	 T3 ;
Semel+:é T3 ;
Semel+:i T3 ;

LEXICON T3
!Cm/th+:the T2 ;
!Cm/n+:ne T2 ;
!Cm/gh+:ghe T2 ;
!Cm/0+: T2 ;


Impf+Sg1+:s V_0_TH ;
Impf+Sg1+:s V_0_GH ;
Impf+Sg1+:s V_N_N ;
Impf+Sg1+:s V_TH_GH ;

Impf+Sg2+:ne V_0_TH ;
Impf+Sg2+:ne V_0_GH ;
Impf+Sg2+:ne V_N_N ;
Impf+Sg2+:ne V_TH_GH ;

Impf+Sg3+: V_0_TH ;
Impf+Sg3+: V_0_GH ;
Impf+Sg3+: V_N_N ;
Impf+Sg3+: V_TH_GH ;

Impf+Du1+:id V_0_TH ;
Impf+Du1+:id V_0_GH ;
Impf+Du1+:id V_N_N ;
Impf+Du1+:id V_TH_GH ;
Impf+Pl1+:id V_0_TH ;
Impf+Pl1+:id V_0_GH ;
Impf+Pl1+:id V_N_N ;
Impf+Pl1+:id V_TH_GH ;

Impf+Du2+:uh V_0_TH ;
Impf+Du2+:uh V_0_GH ;
Impf+Du2+:uh V_N_N ;
Impf+Du2+:uh V_TH_GH ;
Impf+Pl2+:uh V_0_TH ;
Impf+Pl2+:uh V_0_GH ;
Impf+Pl2+:uh V_N_N ;
Impf+Pl2+:uh V_TH_GH ;

Impf+Du3+: V_0_TH ;
Impf+Du3+: V_0_GH ;
Impf+Du3+: V_N_N ;
Impf+Du3+: V_TH_GH ;
Impf+Pl3+: V_0_TH ;
Impf+Pl3+: V_0_GH ;
Impf+Pl3+: V_N_N ;
Impf+Pl3+: V_TH_GH ;

!Prf+Sg1+Cl/l+:ghil V_0_GH ;
!Prf+Sg1+C:i V_0_GH ;
!Prf+Sg1+:thi V_0_GH ;
!Prf+Sg1+:thi V_0_GH ;
!Sg1+:n V_N_N ;
!Sg+:th V_TH_GH ;
!Opt+:wa T2 ;
 
