src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!! -----
!! Verbs in UNDEFINED language are actions.


LEXICON V_0_TH 
bes+V:bes # ;

LEXICON V_0_GH 
jí+V:jí # ;

LEXICON V_N_N 
gha+V:gha # ;

LEXICON V_TH_GH
da+V:da # ; 
